Utah, session 2026, HB43.
Section 1. Section 53F-2-208 is amended to read:53F-2-208. Cost of adjustments for growth and inflation.(1)In accordance with Subsection (5), the Legislature shall annually determine:(a)the estimated state cost of adjusting for inflation in the next fiscal year, based on a rolling five-year average ending in the current fiscal year, ongoing state tax fund appropriations to the following programs:(i)education for youth in care, described in Section 53E-3-503;(ii)concurrent enrollment courses for accelerated foreign language students described in Section 53E-10-307;(iii)the Basic Program, described in Part 3, Basic Program (Weighted Pupil Units);(iv)the Adult Education Program, described in Section 53F-2-401;(v)state support of pupil transportation, described in Section 53F-2-402;(vi)the Enhancement for Accelerated Students Program, described in Section 53F-2-408;(vii)the Concurrent Enrollment Program, described in Section 53F-2-409;(viii)the juvenile gang and other violent crime prevention and intervention program, described in Section 53F-2-410;(ix)the School Safety Support Program, described in Section 53F-2-424;(x)the flexible allocation, described in Section 53F-2-421; and(x)(xi)dual language immersion, described in Section 53F-2-502; and(b)the estimated state cost of adjusting for enrollment growth, in the next fiscal year, the current fiscal year's ongoing state tax fund appropriations to the following programs:(i)a program described in Subsection (1)(a);(ii)educator salary adjustments, described in Section 53F-2-405;(iii)the Salary Supplement for Highly Needed Educators Program, described in Section 53F-2-504;(iv)the Voted and Board Local Levy Guarantee programs, described in Section 53F-2-601; and(v)charter school local replacement funding, described in Section 53F-2-702.(2)The state board shall provide all information necessary to calculate adjustments described in Subsection (1) to the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst no later than October 15 of each year.(3)In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the state board shall make rules to ensure compliance with Subsection (2), including:(a)establishing the necessary information from the LEA, including:(i)fall student enrollment counts;(ii)the number of educators the LEA employs; and(iii)other information as the Utah Code identifies for each program described in Subsection (1); and(b)requiring a deadline for an LEA to provide the information necessary for the state board to comply with Subsection (2).(4)If an LEA does not meet the deadline or provide the required information described in Subsection (3), the state board may not use the LEA's information to calculate growth as described in Subsection (1)(b).(5)(a)In or before December each year, the Executive Appropriations Committee shall determine:(i)the cost of the inflation adjustment described in Subsection (1)(a); and(ii)the cost of the enrollment growth adjustment described in Subsection (1)(b).(b)The Executive Appropriations Committee shall make the determinations described in Subsection (5)(a) based on recommendations developed by the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst, in consultation with the state board and the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget.(6)Beginning in the 2026 fiscal year, if the Executive Appropriations Committee includes in the public education base budget or the final public education budget an increase in the value of the WPU in excess of the amounts described in Subsection (1)(a), the Executive Appropriations Committee shall also include an appropriation to the Local Levy Growth Account established in Section 53F-9-305 in an amount equivalent to at least 0.5% of the total amount appropriated for WPUs in the relevant budget.(7)Notwithstanding Subsection (1)(b), the School Safety Support Program, described in Section 53F-2-424, may not receive funding reductions based on negative enrollment growth.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53F-2-424 is enacted to read:53F-2-424. The School Safety Support Program -- Distribution formula -- State board duties.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Participating LEA" means an LEA that receives money appropriated under this section.(b)"Program" means the School Safety Support Program created in this section.(c)"School Safety Center" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53G-8-801.(d)"State security chief" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53-22-101.(2)There is created the School Safety Support Program to provide funding to an LEA to implement and maintain:(a)school safety personnel requirements described in:(i)Section 53-22-102; and(ii)Section 53G-8-701.5;(b)building and safety standards described in:(i)Section 53-22-102; and(ii)Section 53E-3-706;(c)emergency response protocols described in:(i)Section 53-22-102; and(ii)Section 53G-8-803;(d)safety and security devices and infrastructure described in:(i)Section 53-22-102; and(ii)Section 53G-8-805;(e)safety needs identified from the LEA's school safety needs assessment described in Section 53G-8-701.5; and(f)other school safety requirements or needs established in:(i)Title 53, Chapter 22, School Security Act;(ii)Title 53G, Chapter 8, Part 7, School Safety Personnel; and(iii)Title 53G, Chapter 8, Part 8, State Safety and Support Program.(3)In accordance with Subsection (4) and subject to legislative appropriations, the state board shall:(a)distribute money appropriated under this section to an LEA to implement school safety requirements and needs as described in Subsection (2); and(b)distribute the money as follows:(i)to charter schools, an amount equal to:(A)the total charter school enrollment on October 1 in the prior year, or projected enrollment for a charter school in the charter school's first year of operations, divided by enrollment on October 1 in public schools statewide in the prior year multiplied by the total amount available for distribution; and(B)the amount described in Subsection (3)(b)(i)(A) allocated to each charter school with 20% divided equally among all charter schools, and 80% distributed on a per-student basis; and(ii)to school districts, the remainder of funds available after the distribution to charter schools under Subsection (3)(b)(i), allocated as follows:(A)$250,000 for a school district with enrollment less than 1% of total state enrollment;(B)$175,000 for a school district with enrollment of between 1% and 5% of total state enrollment;(C)$100,000 for a school district with enrollment greater than 5% of total state enrollment; and(D)the remainder distributed on a per-student basis.(iii)if the funds appropriated under this Subsection (3)(b)(ii) are insufficient to fully fund the distribution described, the state board shall distribute the funds on a pro rata basis.(4)In accordance with Subsection (5), to receive money under this section, an LEA shall submit to the School Safety Center:(a)a plan that includes:(i)the LEA's proposed use of program money as the uses align with school safety requirements and needs described in Subsection (2);(ii)measurable goals for improving school safety;(iii)proposed safety compliance timelines; and(iv)coordination efforts with local law enforcement described in Section 53-25-60153-25-701; and(b)an annual report that includes:(i)progress toward achieving the goals submitted under Subsection (4)(a);(ii)expenditure of program money; and(iii)compliance with school safety requirements.(5)(a)Before the calculation is performed in Subsection (3), the state board shall set aside 10% of the appropriation for training reimbursement to law enforcement entities performing the training requirements described in Section 53-22-105.(b)An LEA shall pay a law enforcement entity for the training of school safety personnel described in Section 53-22-105.(c)An LEA shall submit reimbursement requests to the state board to cover expenses for the training of school safety personnel described in Subsections (5)(a) and (b).(6)The state board in collaboration with the School Safety Center and the state security chief, shall:(a)make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to establish:(i)procedures for submitting a plan and distributing money under this section;(ii)permitted uses of program money; and(iii)reporting requirements; and(b)monitor the program's implementation.(7)To reduce administrative burden to an LEA, the state board shall use methods to automate reporting requirements established under this section wherever possible.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 53F-9-204 is amended to read:53F-9-204. Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account.(1)There is created within the Uniform School Fund a restricted account known as the "Public Education Economic Stabilization Restricted Account."(2)(a)Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), the account shall be funded from the following revenue sources:(i)15% of the difference between, as determined by the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst:(A)the estimated amount of ongoing Income Tax Fund and Uniform School Fund revenue available for the Legislature to appropriate for the next fiscal year; and(B)the amount of ongoing appropriations from the Income Tax Fund and Uniform School Fund in the current fiscal year; and(ii)other appropriations as the Legislature may designate.(b)(i)If the appropriation described in Subsection (2)(a) would cause the ongoing appropriations to the account to exceed 11% of Uniform School Fund appropriations described in Section 53F-9-201.1 for the same fiscal year, the Legislature shall appropriate only those funds necessary to ensure that the ongoing appropriations to the account equal 11% of Uniform School Fund appropriations for that fiscal year.(ii)If the appropriation described in Subsection (2)(a) would cause the ongoing appropriations to the account to exceed the limit described in Subsection (2)(b)(i), the Legislature may appropriate to the School Safety Support Program described in Section 53F-2-424 an amount up to 1% of the total weighted pupil unit value for that fiscal year from the revenue that would otherwise be appropriated to the account under Subsection (2)(a).(3)Subject to the availability of ongoing appropriations to the account, in accordance with Utah Constitution, Article X, Section 5, Subsection (4), the ongoing appropriation to the account shall be used to fund:(a)except for a year described in Subsection (3)(b) or (c), one-time appropriations to the public education system, including at least $65,000,000 to the Catalyst Center Grant Program described in Section 53E-3-507.1;(b)the Minimum School Program for a year in which Income Tax Fund revenue and Uniform School Fund revenue are insufficient to fund:(i)ongoing appropriations to the public education system; and(ii)enrollment growth and inflation estimates, as defined in Section 53F-9-201.1; and(c)the minimum basic local amount as defined in Section 53F-2-301 for a year in which the minimum basic tax rate, as defined in Section 53F-2-301, is insufficient to generate the amount described in Subsection 53F-2-301(2)(a).(4)(a)The account shall earn interest.(b)All interest earned on account money shall be deposited in the account.(5)On or before December 31, 2023, and every three years thereafter, the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall:(a)review the percentages described in Subsections (2)(a)(i) and (2)(b); and(b)recommend to the Executive Appropriations Committee any changes based on the review described in Subsection (5)(a).(6)In preparing budget bills for a given fiscal year, the Executive Appropriations Committee shall make the one-time appropriations described in Subsection (3)(a) by appropriating at least the lesser of 10% of the total amount of the one-time appropriations to:(a)the cost of providing 32 paid professional hours for teachers in accordance with Section 53F-7-203;(b)the amount to make the distribution required under Section 53F-2-527;(c)the cost of the Stipends for Future Educators Grant Program described in Section 53F-5-223; and(d)the cost of the Rural School Sports Facilities Grant Program described in Section 53F-10-303.(7)No later than October 15 of each year, the state board shall report to the Office of the Legislative Fiscal Analyst an estimated cost for each of the one-time appropriations described in Subsection (6).

Section 4:
Section 4.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.